Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3802
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby finds that the general welfare of the people of Nebraska will significantly benefit from the conduct of programs designed and intended to enhance the effective marketing of Nebraska's many agricultural commodities.

The Legislature further finds that the meaningful realization of such benefits will result through the administration of programs and policies conceived, desired, and formulated by and for those persons who produce, process, or distribute such commodities as an integral part of their livelihood. It is necessary that the programs conducted by and for the various segments of the agricultural industry be efficiently coordinated, so that the marketing efforts expended on behalf of each commodity will complement the marketing programs in the state.

Laws 1979, LB 538, § 2.